Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7005.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 44-3-12 of the General Laws in Chapter 44-3 entitled "Property
Subject to Taxation" is hereby amended to read as follows:
44-3-12. Visually impaired persons — Exemption.
(a) The property of each person who is legally blind according to federal standards as
certified by a licensed physician or as certified by the Rhode Island services for the blind and
visually impaired shall be exempted from taxation to the amount of six thousand dollars ($6,000),
except for the towns of:
Tiverton. Which exemption shall be provided by town ordinance as a tax credit of three
hundred dollars ($300) or greater; and
Warren. Which exemption shall be up to forty thousand eight hundred ninety-five dollars
($40,895); and
Barrington. Which exemption shall be sixteen thousand dollars ($16,000) for real property.
The exemption shall apply to the property in the municipality where the person resides, and if there
is not sufficient property to exhaust the exemption, the person may proclaim the balance in any city
or town where the person may own property; except for the town of Cumberland, which exemption
shall be up to forty-seven thousand five hundred forty-four dollars ($47,544); and
Cumberland. Which exemption shall be up to forty-seven thousand five hundred forty-four
dollars ($47,544); and
Westerly. Which may provide, by ordinance, an exemption on the total value of real and

personal property not to exceed twenty-nine thousand dollars ($29,000). The city or town council
of any city or town may, by ordinance, increase the exemption within the city or town to an amount
not to exceed twenty-two thousand five hundred dollars ($22,500). The exemption shall not be
allowed in favor of any person who is not a legal resident of the state, or unless the person entitled
to the exemption shall have presented to the assessors, on or before the last day on which sworn
statements may be filed with the assessors for the year for which exemption is claimed, due
evidence that the person is so entitled, which evidence shall stand so long as his or her legal
residence remains unchanged. The exemption provided for in this section, to the extent that it shall
apply to any city or town, shall be applied in full to the total value of the person’s real and tangible
personal property located in the city or town and shall be applied to intangible personal property
only to the extent that there is not sufficient real property or tangible personal property to exhaust
the exemption. This exemption shall be in addition to any other exemption provided by law except
as provided in § 44-3-25.
West Warwick. Which exemption shall be equal to three hundred thirty-five dollars ($335).
(b) In each city or town that has not increased the exemption provided by subsection (a)
above the minimum of six thousand dollars ($6,000), except for the town of:
Barrington. Which exemption shall be sixteen thousand dollars ($16,000) for real property.
The exemption shall increase automatically each year by the same percentage as the percentage
increase in the total amount of taxes levied by the city or town. The automatic increase shall not
apply to cities or towns that have increased the exemption provided by subsection (a) above the
minimum of six thousand dollars ($6,000), except for the town of:
Barrington. Which exemption shall be sixteen thousand dollars ($16,000) for real property.
If the application of the automatic increase to an exemption of six thousand dollars ($6,000) on a
continuous basis from December 31, 1987, to any subsequent assessment date would result in a
higher exemption than the exemption enacted by the city or town council, then the amount provided
by the automatic increase applies.
Barrington. The town of Barrington may, by ordinance, provide a tax dollar credit
reduction for such legally blind person.
(c) The town of Charlestown may, by ordinance, provide a tax dollar credit reduction for
such legally blind person.
(d) The town of Jamestown may, by ordinance, provide a tax dollar credit reduction on
real property for such legally blind person(s).
(e) The town of North Kingstown may, by ordinance, provide a tax dollar credit reduction
or the equivalent assessment dollars on real property for such legally blind person(s).
LC003126 - Page 2 of 4

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003126
========
LC003126 - Page 3 of 4